Utah statutes.
72-1-210.   Department to be assisted by faculties and personnel of
universities.
The engineering machinery and apparatus and the force of mechanics and
instructors in the University of Utah and Utah State University are at the
disposal of the department, and any faculty member of the institutions shall
furnish any information or assistance desired upon request of the department.
